Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.15
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; noncompliance; condemnation; court order; opportunity to comply.

Any lot of commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance not in compliance with the provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the director to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which such product is located. In the event the court finds such product to be in violation of the provisions of such act and orders the condemnation of such product, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the product and the laws of the state. In no instance shall the disposition of such product be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of such product or for permission to process or relabel such product to bring it into compliance with the provisions of the act.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 15, p. 1044;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 16;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 34;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 23.
March 17, 2026